Hawaii, session 2026, HB2125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 414, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§414- Election activities; prohibited.  (a) Any corporation operating under this title or any other state law shall hold all of the corporate powers it held prior to the effective date of Act     , Session Laws of Hawaii 2026; provided that nothing in state law shall be construed to grant or recognize any corporate power to engage in election activity. (b) For the purposes of this section, "election activity" means activity promoting or opposing a political candidate or position on a ballot question." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________